Utah statutes.
35A-8-426.   Agreement by public body to accept payment from authority in lieu of taxes.

In connection with a project of a housing authority located wholly or partly within the area in which a public body is authorized to act, the public body may agree with the housing authority with respect to the payment by the authority of sums in lieu of taxes for any year or period of years that are determined by the authority to be consistent with the maintenance of the low-rent character of housing projects or the achievement of the purposes of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

